The application of botulinum toxin in the prostate.Botulinum neurotoxin is the most potent naturally occurring toxin known to inhibit various neurotransmitters. Injection of botulinum neurotoxin into the bladder and urethral sphincter has been used to treat bladder hyperactivity and sphincter dyssynergia. Recently botulinum neurotoxin application was extended to prostate disorders. Why would a urologist want to target the prostate?We reviewed the literature on the mechanisms of action and clinical efficacy of botulinum neurotoxin treatment of the prostate. In addition to our personal clinical experience and basic research, information was gathered from MEDLINE and published abstracts from international meetings. We also present basic research and discuss the potential mechanism of action of botulinum neurotoxin on the prostate.There are 8 current peer reviewed publications on the injection of botulinum neurotoxin in the prostate. Cystoscopic transurethral or transperineal/transrectal ultrasound guided techniques have been used. Outcome improvement reported includes decreases in prostate size, prostate specific antigen and residual urine volume, and improvement in the flow rate and symptom score lasting 6 months or longer.Botulinum toxin has demonstrated exciting and promising preliminary results for male lower urinary tract symptoms. Translational research suggests novel mechanism of action of botulinum toxin in the prostate for benign prostatic hyperplasia and chronic nonbacterial prostatitis. It may even be considered as adjuvant treatment for prostate cancer. The use of botulinum neurotoxin in the prostate is currently Food and Drug Administration off label and in support of evidence based medicine practices caution should be applied until larger, randomized clinical studies are completed. More basic research is needed to identify the mechanisms by which botulinum toxin affects the prostate.Effect of acupuncture on clinical symptoms and laboratory indicators for chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome: a systematic review and meta-analysis.To systematically review the efficacy and safety of acupuncture for chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome (CP/CPPS).PubMed, Cochrane library Central, Web of Science, Wang-fang Database, and CNKI were searched from their inception to June 30, 2016. Data of acupuncture for CP/CPPS following randomized controlled trials (RCTs) was included. The data were analyzed using the Cochrane Collaboration Review Manager. The primary data were the National Institute of Health-Chronic Prostatitis Index (NIH-CPSI) score at the end of follow-up.Ten RCTs were enrolled. Acupuncture was superior to the control in NIH-CPSI (MD -3.98, [95 % CI -5.78 to -2.19]; P < 0.0001) and response rate (RR 4.12, [95 % CI 1.67-10.18]; P = 0.002). Acupuncture was superior to sham acupuncture on NIH-CPSI, response rate, pain, urinary, and quality of life (QOL). Standard medication was inferior to acupuncture in terms of NIH-CPSI (MD -3.08, [95 % CI -5.57 to -0.60]; P = 0.02) and response rate (RR 2.03, [95 % CI 1.04-3.97]; P = 0.04), but standard medication was superior to acupuncture on improving urinary symptoms. There was no significant difference in the adverse events. Acupuncture/acupuncture plus standard medication significantly down-regulated IL-1β compared with standard medication in prostatic fluid.Acupuncture treating CP/CPPS is effective and safe. The effects of acupuncture on NIH-CPSI, response rate, pain symptoms, and QOF were superior to the control, but standard medication significantly improved urinary symptoms compared with acupuncture. Acupuncture can decrease the IL-1β in prostatic fluid for CP/CPPS.Acupuncture for chronic nonbacterial prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome: a systematic review.The objective of this systematic review was to assess the effectiveness of acupuncture as a treatment option for chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome. Eight databases were searched from their inception to October 2010. Randomized clinical trials (RCT) were considered if they tested acupuncture against any control intervention or no therapy in humans with chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome. The selection of studies, data extraction, and validation were performed independently by 2 reviewers. The methodologic quality of all included RCTs was assessed using the Jadad scale. Studies of stimulation of acupoints other than by needles were excluded. Nine RCTs met the inclusion criteria. They all suggested that acupuncture is effective as a range of control interventions. Their methodologic quality was variable; most were associated with major flaws. Only one RCT had a Jadad score of more than 3. The evidence that acupuncture is effective for chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome is encouraging but, because of several caveats, not conclusive. Therefore, more rigorous studies seem warranted.Minocycline in chronic abacterial prostatitis: a double-blind prospective trial.In patients with chronic abacterial prostatitis, a double-blind trial of 3 months of treatment with minocycline 100 mg twice daily compared with diazepam 5 mg twice daily was undertaken. The percentage fall in polymorphonuclear leucocyte counts in the expressed prostatic secretions was much more marked after treatment with minocycline than with diazepam. Over a follow-up period of at least 12 months, further treatment was necessary in more patients originally treated with diazepam than with minocycline.Cooled transurethral microwave thermotherapy for intractable chronic prostatitis--results of a pilot study after 1 year.To evaluate the side effects, tolerability, and efficacy of transurethral microwave thermotherapy with urethral cooling (cooled TUMT) for chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome in a prospective feasibility trial. Cooled TUMT, using the Targis system from Urologix, is an established treatment option for benign prostatic hyperplasia (BPH) with minimal side effects.Patients with intractable chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome and symptoms for more than 3 of the 6 months before treatment (National Institutes of Health-Chronic Prostatitis Symptom Index [NIH-CPSI] pain score of at least 8) were randomized to cooled TUMT at an intraprostatic temperature of either approximately 55 degrees C or approximately 70 degrees C. Tolerability, side effects, and efficacy were measured with standard diagnostic tests, including the NIH-CPSI. Subgroup analysis was performed to evaluate the effects with and without BPH comorbidity.A total of 42 patients were included in the study; 39 patients successfully completed treatment and 35 completed follow-up through 12 months. The baseline versus 12-month mean NIH-CPSI score was total score 23.4 +/- 6.4 versus 11.5 +/- 10.2 (improvement in mean value of 51%), pain score 11.5 +/- 2.8 versus 4.6 +/- 4.9 (improvement in mean value of 60%), quality-of-life impact score 7.2 +/- 2.9 versus 3.8 +/- 3.8 (improvement in mean value of 47%; all P <0.0001), and urinary score 4.7 +/- 2.8 versus 3.1 +/- 3.0 (improvement in mean value of 34%; P = 0.0079). Treatment discomfort was within the ranges reported for patients with Targis-treated BPH. Two patients had reduced sperm motility. Side effects were minimal and transient, resolved spontaneously or with medication, and were similar regardless of treatment temperature or BPH comorbidity.Cooled TUMT appears to be promising for intractable chronic prostatitis with or without BPH. Longer follow-up and a larger trial are required to evaluate the fertility impact and longer term durability further.Extracorporeal shock wave therapy for the treatment of chronic pelvic pain syndrome in males: a randomised, double-blind, placebo-controlled study.There is no sufficiently validated therapy for chronic pelvic pain syndrome (CPPS).To investigate the effects of extracorporeal shock wave therapy (ESWT) in 60 patients suffering from CPPS.Sixty patients suffering from CPPS for at least 3 mo were investigated in two groups. Both groups were treated four times (once per week), each by 3000 impulses; group 2 was performed as a sham procedure. The investigation was designed as a placebo-controlled, prospectively randomised, double-blind phase 2 study. Standardised follow-up was performed 1, 4, and 12 wk after ESWT.Low-energy-density ESWT was performed using a perineal approach without anaesthesia. In the placebo group, the same setting was used without shock wave energy transmission.ESWT effects on pain, quality of life (QoL), erectile function (EF), and micturition were evaluated. The parameters were investigated using validated questionnaires (National Institutes of Health Chronic Prostatitis Symptom Index [NIH-CPSI], International Prostate Symptom Score [IPSS], International Index of Erectile Function [IIEF]) and the Visual Analog Scale (VAS) for pain evaluation.All patients completed outpatient treatments and follow-ups without any problems. All 30 patients in the verum group showed statistically (highly) significant improvement of pain, QoL, and voiding conditions following ESWT in comparison to the placebo group, which experienced a continuous deterioration of the same parameters during the follow-up period. Perineal ESWT was easy and safe to perform without anaesthesia or any side-effects.This is the first prospectively randomised, double-blind study to reveal perineal ESWT as a therapy option for CPPS with statistically significant effects in comparison to placebo. ESWT may in particular be interesting because of its easy and inexpensive application, the lack of any side-effects, and the potential for repetition of the treatment at any time.Efficiency of posterior tibial nerve stimulation in category IIIB chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain: a Sham-Controlled Comparative Study.To evaluate the efficacy of percutaneous posterior tibial nerve stimulation (PTNS) for treatment of the patients with category IIIB chronic non-bacterial prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome.A total of 89 patients with therapy-resistant pelvic pain were randomized to receive either nerve stimulation (n = 45) or sham treatment (n = 44). The National Institutes of Health Chronic Prostatitis Symptom Index and visual analogue scale were used to assess treatment success after 12 weeks of intervention. Objective success was defined as a minimum 50% decrease in the mean scores. A decrease of over 25% to below 50% was considered to be a partial response.An objective response was observed with the pain and symptom scores after 12 weeks of PTNS in 18 (40%) and 30 (66.6%) of the patients, whereas a partial response was observed in 27 (60%) and 15 (33.3%) of the patients, respectively. Mean symptom scores and visual analogue scale scores for pain and urgency were significantly changed from 23.6 +/- 6.3 at baseline to 10.2 +/- 3.6, 7.6 +/- 0.8 at baseline to 4.3 +/- 0.6, 5.7 +/- 0.8 at baseline to 3.4 +/- 0.7, respectively. Scores for the symptoms, urgency and pain were not changed with sham treatment.These results have demonstrated that percutaneous PTNS may relieve pain in the patients with category IIIB chronic non-bacterial prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome.A prospective interventional study in chronic prostatitis with emphasis to clinical features.Chronic bacterial prostatitis displays a variety of symptoms (mainly local pain exhibiting vari­ability in origin and intensity). These symptoms often persist despite bacterial eradication. The purpose of this article is to exam the role of phytotherapeutic agents as complementary treatment in patients with bacterial prostatitis.The material consisted of individuals with reported pelvic discomfort and genital pain with or without lower urinary tract symptoms (LUTS) and sexual dysfunction visiting our department from March 2009 to March 2011. Patients underwent Stamey-Meares test (several cases underwent the two glass test). Depending on history and specific symptoms urethral smear and semen cultures were additionally obtained from several patients. All patients were randomized into two groups. Subjects in the first group (72 patients) received appropriate antibiotic (according to the sensitivity test) for 15 days, while subjects in the second group (72 patients) received phytotherapeutic agents for 30 days, additionally the conventional 15 days antibiotic treatment. The response was tested using laboratory and clinical criteria.We found no statistically significant differences between the two groups regarding bacterial and symptom persistence rate, however, symptoms burden was lower in patients receiving combinational treatment.Phytotherapeutic agents may improve pain and prostatitis related difficulty in urination. Further randomized, placebo-controlled studies are needed to substantiate safer conclusions.Randomized multicenter feasibility trial of myofascial physical therapy for the treatment of urological chronic pelvic pain syndromes.We determined the feasibility of conducting a randomized clinical trial designed to compare 2 methods of manual therapy (myofascial physical therapy and global therapeutic massage) in patients with urological chronic pelvic pain syndromes.We recruited 48 subjects with chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome or interstitial cystitis/painful bladder syndrome at 6 clinical centers. Eligible patients were randomized to myofascial physical therapy or global therapeutic massage and were scheduled to receive up to 10 weekly treatments of 1 hour each. Criteria to assess feasibility included adherence of therapists to prescribed therapeutic protocol as determined by records of treatment, adverse events during study treatment and rate of response to therapy as assessed by the patient global response assessment. Primary outcome analysis compared response rates between treatment arms using Mantel-Haenszel methods.There were 23 (49%) men and 24 (51%) women randomized during a 6-month period. Of the patients 24 (51%) were randomized to global therapeutic massage, 23 (49%) to myofascial physical therapy and 44 (94%) completed the study. Therapist adherence to the treatment protocols was excellent. The global response assessment response rate of 57% in the myofascial physical therapy group was significantly higher than the rate of 21% in the global therapeutic massage treatment group (p = 0.03).We judged the feasibility of conducting a full-scale trial of physical therapy methods and the preliminary findings of a beneficial effect of myofascial physical therapy warrants further study.[Efficacy of magnetolaser therapy of patients with an inflammatory form of chronic abacterial prostatitis].To assess efficacy of magnetolaser therapy (KAP-ELM-01 Andro-Gin unit) in the treatment of inflammatory chronic abacterial prostatitis (ICAP), 68 ICAP patients were divided into 2 groups. Group 1 patients (n = 33) received standard therapy. Group 2 patients received standard therapy plus magnetolaser (ML) therapy. The effect was assessed by the symptoms scale and indices of kallirrein-kinin system. After treatment pain relieved by 36,9%, on the average, in group 1 and by 63.1% in group 2. Lower urinary tract symptoms regressed insignificantly in both groups: by 4.8% and 7.1%, respectively. Quality of life improved by 27.6 and 65.5%, respectively. Kallikrein activity in prostatic secretion remained high in both groups. A 21.7% rise (p < 0.05) of prokallikrein level was seen after treatment only in group 2. Activity of KKS inhibitors (alpha2-MG and alphal-PI) in prostatic secretion normalized in group 2. Total activity of serin proteinases lowered in both groups (p < 0.05). High activity of alphal-PI (8.21 + 1.97 U/ml) persisted in group 1. Thus, standard treatment of ICAP does not result in biochemical normalization of prostatic secretion. ML therapy is more effective.[Efficiency and safety of prostamol-Uno in patients with chronic abacterial prostatitis].In this open label prospective study in patients with category III prostatitis we assessed efficacy and safety of Sabal serrulata plant extract (prostamol Uno 320 mg) (group I, n=30) as compared to watchful waiting (group II, n=24). Efficacy was evaluated by means of NIH-CPSI, IPSS-QoL questionnaires, patients' general subjective assessment of treatment outcome, uroflowmetry and transrectal Doppler mapping (colour doppler and spectral doppler) of the prostate. Patients receiving prostamol Uno in comparison with watchful waiting group had significant improvement of mean NIH-CPSI (from 17.8 to 11.4 vs 17.1 to 16.5) and IPSS (from 13.0 to 6.3 vs 13.2 to 11.6) scores, Qmax values (from 12.9 ml/s to 17.8 ml/s vs 13.3 ml/s to 14.4 ml/s) and Doppler parameters of vascular resistance in the prostate. According to the patients' subjective assessment, moderate and significant improvement was reported by 76.7% patients in prostamol Uno group vs 23.3% in the watchful waiting group. There were no severe side effects. In prostamol Uno group one patient (3.3%) had moderate dyspepsia that resolved without termination of the drug administration. Prostamol Uno showed good efficacy and safety profile in patients with category III prostatitis.Complementary and alternative medicine for chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome.To discuss challenges concerning treatment for chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome (CP/CPPS) and review complementary and alternative medical (CAM) therapies being evaluated for this condition, we performed a comprehensive search of articles published from 1990-2005 using the PubMed, Medline databases. Data from the articles were abstracted and pooled by subject. Keywords cross-searched with CP/CPPS included: complementary, alternative, integrative, therapies, interventions, nutrition, antioxidants, herbs, supplements, biofeedback and acupuncture. Listed articles with no abstracts were not included. Various CAM therapies for CP/CPPS exist including biofeedback, acupuncture, hyperthermia and electrostimulation. Additionally, a variety of in vitro and in vivo studies testing herbal and nutritional supplements were found. Saw palmetto, cernilton and quercetin were the most frequently tested supplements for CP/CPPS. Although many CAM therapies demonstrate positive preliminary observations as prospective treatments for CP/CPPS, further exploratory studies including more randomized, controlled trials are necessary for significant validation as treatment options for this complex disorder.A prospective, randomized, placebo controlled, double-blind study of pelvic electromagnetic therapy for the treatment of chronic pelvic pain syndrome with 1 year of followup.Male chronic pelvic pain syndrome is a condition of uncertain etiology and treatment is often unsatisfactory. There is evidence that the symptom complex may result from pelvic floor muscular dysfunction and/or neural hypersensitivity/inflammation. We hypothesized that the application of electromagnetic therapy may have a neuromodulating effect on pelvic floor spasm and neural hypersensitivity.Following full Stamey localization men with National Institute of Diabetes and Digestive and Kidney Diseases category III prostatitis were prospectively randomized to receive active electromagnetic or placebo therapy. Active therapy consisted of 15 minutes of pelvic floor stimulation at a frequency of 10 Hz, followed by a further 15 minutes at 50 Hz, twice weekly for 4 weeks. Patients were evaluated at baseline, 3 months and 1 year after treatment using validated visual analog scores.A total of 21 men with a mean age of 47.8 years (range 25 to 67) were analyzed. Mean symptom scores decreased significantly in the actively treated group at 3 months and 1 year (p <0.05), unlike the placebo group, which showed no significant change (p >0.05). Subanalysis of those receiving active treatment showed that the greatest improvement was in pain related symptoms.The novel use of pelvic floor electromagnetic therapy may be a promising new noninvasive option for chronic pelvic pain syndrome in men.Comparison of the efficiency of combined extracorporeal shock-wave therapy and triple therapy versus triple therapy itself in Category III B chronic pelvic pain syndrome (CPPS). The aim of this study is to determine the effect of combining extracorporeal shock-wave therapy (ESWT) and triple therapy versus triple therapy alone, when treating Category III B chronic prostatitis (CPPS). Study included 60 patients, classified as having CPPS, divided into two groups: the first group numbered 30 patients, who were treated with a combination of an α-blocker, an anti-inflammatory agent and a muscle relaxant; the second group consisted of 30 patients who received a combination of ESWT and the fore-mentioned triple therapy. Patients were treated for 12 weeks. The primary criterion of a response to therapy was scoring 2 or less on the NIH-CPSI quality of life item, while the secondary criterion of a response to therapy was a greater than a 50% reduction in NIH-CPSI pain score. Patients who received triple therapy did not show a significant change neither in post void residual urine (PVR) nor in maximum flow rate (Q Acupuncture versus sham acupuncture for chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain.Chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome (CP/CPPS) afflicts 2%-10% of adult men. Available therapies offer little or no proven benefit. Because acupuncture represents an attractive "natural" therapy, we compared the efficacy of acupuncture to sham acupuncture for CP/CPPS.Participants met US National Institutes of Health (NIH) consensus criteria for CP/CPPS, were aged > or = 20 years old, and had a total score > or = 15 on the NIH Chronic Prostatitis Symptom Index (NIH-CPSI) and symptoms for at least 3 of the preceding 6 months. They were randomized 1:1 to acupuncture or sham acupuncture. Treatment consisted of twice-weekly 30-minute sessions for 10 weeks (20 sessions total) without needle stimulation, herbs, or adjuvants. The primary response criterion was a 6-point decrease from baseline to week 10 in NIH-CPSI total score (range 0-43).Thirty-two (73%) of 44 participants responded in the acupuncture group compared with 21 (47%) of 45 sham group participants (relative risk 1.81, 95% confidence interval, 1.3-3.1, P = .02). Long-term responses 24 weeks after completing therapy without additional treatment occurred in 14 (32%) of 44 acupuncture group participants and in 6 (13%) of 45 sham group participants (relative risk 2.39, 95% confidence interval, 1.0-5.6, P = .04).After 10 weeks of treatment, acupuncture proved almost twice as likely as sham treatment to improve CP/CPPS symptoms. Participants receiving acupuncture were 2.4-fold more likely to experience long-term benefit than were participants receiving sham acupuncture.[Gentos in the treatment of chronic abacterial prostatitis].Gentos was given to 46 patients with chronic abacterial prostatitis. The results of the treatment were analysed for 39 of them. Compared to control group, efficacy of gentos was 64.5-71.8% versus 53.6%. It can be used both as monotherapy and in combination with other modalities. Side effects of gentos were not registered.[Administration of oral vitaprost for prevention of exacerbations of chronic abacterial prostatitis].Active substance of vitaprost is a complex of water-soluble biologically active peptides isolated from bovine prostate. The prostatic extract has an organotropic action in relation to the prostate. As all peptide bioregulators, prostatic extract has antiaggregant and anticoagulant properties, enhances synthesis of antihistamine and antiserotonine antibodies, improves microcirculation in the prostatic gland. This accounts for its ability to reduce edema in prostatic inflammation. This clinical trial demonstrated that vitaprost tablets decreases twice probability of chronic prostatitis exacerbation, of development of secondary exacerbations. A prophylactic intake of vitaprost relieves symptoms of chronic prostatitis, first of all pain (discomfort), improvement of quality of life by NIH-CPSI, including exacerbation and significantly reduces size of the prostate. Vitaprost tablets can be effectively used prophylactively in chronic prostatitis for reducing probability of the disease exacerbations and their severity.Randomized multicenter feasibility trial of myofascial physical therapy for the treatment of urological chronic pelvic pain syndromes.We determined the feasibility of conducting a randomized clinical trial designed to compare 2 methods of manual therapy (myofascial physical therapy and global therapeutic massage) in patients with urological chronic pelvic pain syndromes.We recruited 48 subjects with chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome or interstitial cystitis/painful bladder syndrome at 6 clinical centers. Eligible patients were randomized to myofascial physical therapy or global therapeutic massage and were scheduled to receive up to 10 weekly treatments of 1 hour each. Criteria to assess feasibility included adherence of therapists to prescribed therapeutic protocol as determined by records of treatment, adverse events during study treatment and rate of response to therapy as assessed by the patient global response assessment. Primary outcome analysis compared response rates between treatment arms using Mantel-Haenszel methods.There were 23 (49%) men and 24 (51%) women randomized during a 6-month period. Of the patients 24 (51%) were randomized to global therapeutic massage, 23 (49%) to myofascial physical therapy and 44 (94%) completed the study. Therapist adherence to the treatment protocols was excellent. The global response assessment response rate of 57% in the myofascial physical therapy group was significantly higher than the rate of 21% in the global therapeutic massage treatment group (p = 0.03).We judged the feasibility of conducting a full-scale trial of physical therapy methods and the preliminary findings of a beneficial effect of myofascial physical therapy warrants further study.The effects of transrectal radiofrequency hyperthermia on patients with chronic prostatitis and the changes of MDA, NO, SOD, and Zn levels in pretreatment and posttreatment.To assess the effect of transrectal radiofrequency hyperthermia (TRFH) in 159 patients with chronic prostatitis (CP) and explore the changes of reactive oxygen species in CP patients pretreatment and posttreatment.Patients diagnosed with CP were randomized to 6 weeks of tamsulosin plus clarithromycin, TRFH, or TRFH with tamsulosin plus clarithromycin group. The primary outcome measure was evaluated by the National Institutes of Health Chronic Prostatitis Symptom Index. Malondiadehyde (MDA), superoxide dismutase (SOD), and nitrogen monoxide (NO) were measured by biochemical assay. Zinc (Zn) content was assayed by atomical spectrophotography.All 105 patients in the TRFH or TRFH with tamsulosin plus clarithromycin group showed statistically significant improvement of pain, quality of life, and micturition domains compared with the tamsulosin plus clarithromycin group. Regardless of type IIIa or type IIIb CP, there was a significant improvement in the TRFH or TRFH with tamsulosin plus clarithromycin group compared with tamsulosin plus clarithromycin group (P<.05). Compared with pretreatment, MDA, NO, and Zn were decreased in type II and IIIa, whereas SOD was only increased significantly in type II (P<.05).Our study reveals TRFH as an effective therapy option for CP, especially type IIIa or type IIIb CP. The results of TRFH with tamsulosin plus clarithromycin group was superior to the TRFH group or the tamsulosin plus clarithromycin group alone. In comparison with pretreatment, differences in reactive oxygen species levels and Zn in CP patients suggest that these factors could be used as a biomarker to evaluate the symptoms of CP and the effects of treatment.Circumcision plus antibiotic, anti-inflammatory, and α-blocker therapy for the treatment for chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome: a prospective, randomized, multicenter trial.The purpose of the study was to evaluate the efficacy of circumcision combined with antibiotic, anti-inflammatory, and α-blocker therapy for the treatment for chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome (CP/CPPS).Subjects assigned to the circumcision group were given antibiotic, anti-inflammatory, and α-blocker medications and scheduled for surgery the same period in each site by study clinicians. Subjects assigned to the control group were asked to only take the same medications and remain uncircumcised until the end of the 3-month study period. The primary outcome was a reduction of at least four points on the National Institutes of Health Chronic Prostatitis Symptom Index (NIH-CPSI).A total of 774 eligible participants underwent randomization, and the ratio of men with a decrease of at least four points on the total NIH-CPSI score from baseline to 12 weeks was 84.6% in the circumcision group and 68.5% in the control group (P < 0.001). Of the 713 men who completed the trial, the median total NIH-CPSI score decreased significantly from 21.0 ± 7.0 to 12.0 ± 8.0 (P < 0.001) in the circumcision group, and in the control group, the change was from 21.0 ± 8.0 to 15.0 ± 7.0 (P < 0.001). Comparison of the changes in the total and three subdomain NIH-CPSI scores over time revealed significant differences between the circumcision and control groups (P < 0.001).Our findings show that circumcision plus antibiotic, anti-inflammatory, and α-blocker therapy for CP/CPPS patients resulted in improved NIH-CPSI scores compared with medication therapy only.Evaluation of prostatic massage in treatment of chronic prostatitis.To evaluate the efficacy of regular prostatic massage in combination with culture-specific antibiotic therapy for men with chronic prostatitis.This study included 81 consecutive patients who attended our outpatient clinic with a history or symptoms suggestive of chronic prostatitis (National Institutes of Health category II and IIIA). In addition to prostatic culture and sensitivity, all patients were asked to complete the National Institutes of Health Chronic Prostatitis Symptom Index. According to their chronic prostatitis category, all patients were divided into four groups: group 1, chronic bacterial prostatitis treated with antibiotics and prostatic massage, n = 17; group 2, chronic bacterial prostatitis treated with antibiotics alone, n = 20; group 3, chronic nonbacterial prostatitis treated with antibiotics and prostatic massage, n = 25; and group 4, chronic nonbacterial prostatitis treated with antibiotics alone, n = 19.Of the 37 patients with initially positive cultures, 30 (81.1%) had sterile final cultures. Overall, 30 patients (37%) of 81 had complete resolution of symptoms, 18 (22.2%) had initial resolution but had recurrence after therapy, 22 (27.1%) had partial improvement, and 11 (13.5%) had no improvement. No significant difference was found in the response between patients treated with antibiotics alone and those treated with antibiotics and prostatic massage in all four groups. Only 29% of class IIIa patients had complete improvement in contrast to 52% complete improvement in the class II patients.Prostatic massage did not significantly improve the response of patients with chronic pelvic pain syndrome to antibiotics. Patients with National Institutes of Health class II prostatitis should be primarily treated with culture-sensitive antibiotics. Treatment of nonbacterial prostatitis is challenging and requires additional extensive research.[Treatment of external RF hyperthermia combining with alpha 1-adrenergic receptor blocker for patients with prostatodynia and chronic non-bacterial prostatitis].To evaluate a new effective treatment for prostatodynia (PD) and chronic non-bacterial prostatitis (CNP).One hundred and thirty-six patients suffered from PD or CNP were divided randomly into experiment group (n = 76), which were treated with external RF hyperthermia (ERFH) combining with alpha 1-adrenergic receptor blocker Terazosin for 12 weeks, and control group (n = 60), which were only treated with ERFH. Symptoms scores, urodynamic indexes and expressed prostate secretion were recorded pre- and post-treatments.MFR and AFR were significantly improved and symptoms scores significantly decreased in both groups (P < 0.05). The efficacy was better in experiment group than that in control group. The combination treatment also led to a significantly decrease in MUP and MUCP (P < 0.05). Additionally, the leucocytes in expressed prostate secretion were also reduced in experiment group (P < 0.05).Treatment of ERFH combining with alpha 1-adrenergic receptor blocker for patients with PD or CNP was effective and had little side-effect, while the future curative effect should be observed furtherly.[The role of Proxelan in the treatment of chronic prostatitis. Results of a randomized trial].Inflammatory diseases of the prostate are one of the most difficult problems to manage in the fertile male aged between 20 and 50. Antibiotics are the gold standard for the treatment of both bacterial (category II-NIH) and non bacterial prostatitis (category III-NIH). However, antibiotics need to be associated with other therapies focused on reducing symptoms and providing a better quality of life. In the present study we sought to test the effectiveness of antibiotics and the medical device Proxelan suppositories taken together.Starting in January 2011, we conducted a randomized controlled trial involving 60 subjects with bacterial and non bacterial chronic prostatitis, who were divided into two groups. Subjects allocated in group A received only antibiotics for 28 days; subjects in group B received antibiotics + Proxelan, for 28 days as well. Before randomization all subjects underwent Meares-Stamey test, IPSS and NIH-CPSI questionnairs. All of those were repeated 60 and 120 days after randomization. Microbiological and clinical efficacy were compared using specific statistical analyses.Data were obtained from 29 subjects allocated in group A and 31 in group B. Minor side effects were observed which did not cause study interruption in any case. Of the total population, 68,3% resulted positive to the Meares-Stamey test at study start. Proxelan was not better than antibiotics alone under a microbiological point of view (OR)=0.9; (IR) 0.3-2.8; P=0.46. According to the answers provided at the NIH-CPSI questionnaire, subjects in the group B obtained a better score compared to group A, either after 2 months (OR:2.8; 95%IC 1.2-4.1; P=0.017) and after 4 months (OR:1.67; 95%IC 0.9-2.9; P=0.04). With regards to the IPSS questionnaire, 2 months after treatment start, subjects in the group A had a probability of having urinary symptoms 2 times higher compared to subjects in group B (OR:1.9; 95%IC 1.0-3.5; P=0.028). Although Proxelan seems to improve IPSS also after 4 months, the difference does not reach the level of statistical significance.Compared to antibiotics alone, the combination of antibiotics and Proxelan improve both symptoms associated to chronic prostatitis and urinary symptoms, however microbiological results are not different. Future studies may be required to confirm our results and to explain the mechanism of action of Proxelan.Sono-electro-magnetic therapy for treating chronic pelvic pain syndrome in men: a randomized, placebo-controlled, double-blind trial.To assess the efficacy and safety of sono-electro-magnetic therapy compared to placebo in men with refractory CPPS.In a randomized, placebo-controlled, double-blind single center trial, we assessed the effect of sono-electro-magnetic therapy in men with treatment refractory CPPS. Sixty male patients were randomly assigned to treatment with either sono-electro-magnetic (n = 30) or placebo therapy (n = 30) for 12 weeks. The primary outcome was a change in the National Institutes of Health Chronic Prostatitis Symptom Index (NIH-CPSI) from baseline to 12 weeks.The 12-week difference between sono-electro-magnetic and placebo therapy in changes of the NIH-CPSI total score was -3.1 points (95% CI -6.8 to 0.6, p = 0.11). In secondary comparisons of NIH-CPSI sub-scores, we found differences between groups most pronounced for the quality-of-life sub-score (difference at 12 weeks -1.6, 95% CI -2.8 to -0.4, p = 0.015). In stratified analyses, the benefit of sono-electro-magnetic therapy appeared more pronounced among patients who had a symptom duration of 12 months or less (difference in NIH-CPSI total score -8.3, 95% CI -14.5 to 2.6) than in patients with a longer symptom duration (-0.8, 95% CI -4.6 to 3.1; p for interaction = 0.023).Sono-electro-magnetic therapy did not result in a significant improvement of symptoms in the overall cohort of treatment refractory CPPS patients compared to placebo treatment. Subgroup analysis indicates, however, that patients with a symptom-duration of 12 months or less may benefit from sono-electro-magnetic therapy, warranting larger randomized controlled trials in this subpopulation.ClinicalTrials.gov NCT00688506.Alpha-blockers for the treatment of chronic prostatitis in combination with antibiotics.This study was undertaken to evaluate the immediate and long-term effects of the combination of alpha-blockers and antibiotics in the treatment of chronic prostatitis.The patients eligible for study were assigned to 3 groups: group 1--nonprostatodynia, abacterial prostatitis (134), group 2--prostatodynia (72) and group 3--chronic bacterial prostatitis (64). alpha-Blockers were administered to all patients of groups 1 and 2 with demonstrable high maximal urethral closure pressure and typical clinical complaints irrespective of the presence of inflammatory findings in expressed prostatic secretion. alpha-Blockers were given to 50% of patients with bacterial prostatitis. Antibiotics were administered to all patients with positive expressed prostatic secretion cultures, and in half of those with abacterial prostatitis and inflammatory expressed prostatic secretion. Mean followup was 22 months (range 6 months to 3 years). The sign 1-tailed test was used for statistical analysis of data.The recurrence rate of bacterial prostatitis was significantly reduced by alpha-blockade (expressed prostatic secretion culture negative) and symptom relief was achieved for many months. For abacterial prostatitis statistical analysis revealed a lower symptom recurrence rate in patients receiving only alpha-blockers in comparison with those treated with a combination of alpha-blockers and antibiotics.The use of alpha-blockers is justified, not only for prostatodynia, but also for abacterial and bacterial prostatitis. In the latter case alpha-blockade not only caused enhanced clinical improvement but also reduced the recurrences as defined by expressed prostatic secretion positive segmental cultures.Physical activity of men with chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome not satisfied with conventional treatments--could it represent a valid option? The physical activity and male pelvic pain trial: a double-blind, randomized study.Chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome is a major healthcare burden. Affected patient quality of life is poor and currently no investigated treatments have significant long-term benefit. We performed a preliminary investigation of the role of physical activity and its effects on select patients with chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome.Between 2002 and 2004 we recruited a volunteer sample of 231 eligible males 20 to 50 years old with chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome who were unresponsive to conventional treatments and free of any contraindication for moderate intensity physical exercise. This group was screened and, if in accordance with study inclusion/exclusion criteria, patients were randomized into 2 groups. Participants were randomly assigned to the aerobic exercise group (52) and the placebo/stretching and motion exercises group (51). Main outcome measures were the Italian version of the National Institutes of Health Chronic Prostatitis Symptom Index, Beck Depression Inventory, State Anxiety Inventory-Y and a pain intensity visual analog scale administered at baseline, and 6 and 18 weeks.At 18 weeks 36 subjects (75%) in the aerobic exercise group vs 40 (81.63%) in the placebo/stretching and motion exercises group completed the 18-week program and evaluation. Differences between the 2 groups were found in total National Institutes of Health Chronic Prostatitis Symptom Index, pain and quality life impact subscales, and pain visual analog score (ANCOVA p = 0.006, 0.0009, 0.02 and 0.003, respectively).Improvements in the aerobic exercise group were significantly superior compared to those in the placebo/stretching and motion exercises group. Aerobic exercise represents a valid treatment option and it should be further investigated in a larger study with longer followup.Management of chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome: a systematic review and network meta-analysis.Chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome (CP/CPPS) is common, but trial evidence is conflicting and therapeutic options are controversial.To conduct a systematic review and network meta-analysis comparing mean symptom scores and treatment response among α-blockers, antibiotics, anti-inflammatory drugs, other active drugs (phytotherapy, glycosaminoglycans, finasteride, and neuromodulators), and placebo.We searched MEDLINE from 1949 and EMBASE from 1974 to November 16, 2010, using the PubMed and Ovid search engines.Randomized controlled trials comparing drug treatments in CP/CPPS patients.Two reviewers independently extracted mean symptom scores, quality-of-life measures, and response to treatment between treatment groups. Standardized mean difference and random-effects methods were applied for pooling continuous and dichotomous outcomes, respectively. A longitudinal mixed regression model was used for network meta-analysis to indirectly compare treatment effects.Twenty-three of 262 studies identified were eligible. Compared with placebo, α-blockers were associated with significant improvement in symptoms with standardized mean differences in total symptom, pain, voiding, and quality-of-life scores of -1.7 (95% confidence interval [CI], -2.8 to -0.6), -1.1 (95% CI, -1.8 to -0.3), -1.4 (95% CI, -2.3 to -0.5), and -1.0 (95% CI, -1.8 to -0.2), respectively. Patients receiving α-blockers or anti-inflammatory medications had a higher chance of favorable response compared with placebo, with pooled RRs of 1.6 (95% CI, 1.1-2.3) and 1.8 (95% CI, 1.2-2.6), respectively. Contour-enhanced funnel plots suggested the presence of publication bias for smaller studies of α-blocker therapies. The network meta-analysis suggested benefits of antibiotics in decreasing total symptom scores (-9.8; 95% CI, -15.1 to -4.6), pain scores (-4.4; 95% CI, -7.0 to -1.9), voiding scores (-2.8; 95% CI, -4.1 to -1.6), and quality-of-life scores (-1.9; 95% CI, -3.6 to -0.2) compared with placebo. Combining α-blockers and antibiotics yielded the greatest benefits compared with placebo, with corresponding decreases of -13.8 (95% CI, -17.5 to -10.2) for total symptom scores, -5.7 (95% CI, -7.8 to -3.6) for pain scores, -3.7 (95% CI, -5.2 to -2.1) for voiding, and -2.8 (95% CI, -4.7 to -0.9) for quality-of-life scores.α-Blockers, antibiotics, and combinations of these therapies appear to achieve the greatest improvement in clinical symptom scores compared with placebo. Anti-inflammatory therapies have a lesser but measurable benefit on selected outcomes. However, beneficial effects of α-blockers may be overestimated because of publication bias.Transurethral needle ablation for the treatment of chronic pelvic pain syndrome (category III prostatitis): a randomized, sham-controlled study.To investigate the effectiveness and durability of transurethral needle ablation (TUNA) in the treatment of symptoms of chronic pelvic pain syndrome (CPPS) in a randomized, single-blind, sham-controlled study.Thirty-three patients with moderate-to-severe symptoms of CPPS were randomized to either TUNA (n = 25) or urethrocystoscopy as a sham treatment (n = 8). The response to therapy was evaluated 3, 6, and 12 months after treatment using the Prostatitis Symptom Severity Index (PSSI), the International Prostate Symptom Score (IPSS), a visual analogue scale, and prostate volume, prostate-specific antigen, urinary flow, and residual urine volume measurements.The PSSI decreased in both groups (TUNA group, P <0.001; sham group, P not significant), but no statistically significant difference was detected between them. Similarly, the IPSS decreased in the two groups (TUNA group, P = 0.002; sham group, P = 0.05), but no difference was found between those treated with TUNA and those who underwent sham treatment. Also the quality of life (IPSS-8) was significantly better at 12 months in both groups, but no difference was detected between them. Changes in pain score (visual analogue scale) were not statistically significant. Peak urinary flow rate, residual urine volume, prostate-specific antigen, and prostate volume were not altered in either group.The efficacy of TUNA in CPPS is comparable to sham treatment, and so cannot be recommended as routine treatment of CPPS.Is there a role for transrectal microwave hyperthermia of the prostate in the treatment of abacterial prostatitis and prostatodynia?Transrectal microwave hyperthermia of the prostate was administered to 54 patients with chronic abacterial prostatitis or prostatodynia, who failed to respond to several courses of conventional therapies. Hyperthermia was delivered in 60-min long sessions with three randomly chosen regimens (1 session/week for 4 weeks; 1 session/week for 6 weeks; 2 sessions/week for 3 weeks). A prostatic temperature of 42.5 +/- 0.5 degrees C was maintained throughout the entire duration of each session. Patients were assessed pre- and postoperatively by scoring of subjective symptoms, uroflowmetry with flow nomograms, determination of residual urine volume, and transrectal ultrasonography of the prostate. At the long-term follow-up, the subjective symptom score was significantly improved in all patients. Fifty percent of the patients also reported an improvement of life quality, 47% reported their condition unchanged, and 3% reported deterioration, despite therapy. Urodynamic parameters improved but did not reach statistical significance. No major complications were encountered. Our preliminary data indicate that transrectal microwave hyperthermia of the prostate is a safe therapy that can be beneficial as a second line treatment in selected patients with recurring symptoms of abacterial prostatitis or prostatodynia, which do not respond to medical therapy.[Clinical trials of combined therapy of an oral Chinese medicine with massage for chronic nonbacterial prostatitis].To evaluate the clinical effect of an oral Chinese medicine combined with massage of the prostate in treating chronic nonbacterial prostatitis (CNP).Seventy-two CNP patients were randomly divided into an experimental group (oral Chinese medicine with massage) and a control group (oral Chinese medicine only). The main parameters were compared before and two months after the treatment.Total efficacy rates of the experimental and control groups were 90.0% and 68.6%, respectively. Compared with the controls, patients in the experiment group had a lower score on NIH-CPSI, and the difference was significant statistically (P < 0.05).The combined therapy is more effective than oral Chinese medicine alone for the treatment of CNP.[Use of oral vitaprost in the treatment of chronic abacterial prostatitis].An open trial performed in 2001 by the Research Institute of Urology has demonstrated good efficacy and safety of rectal suppositoria Vitaprost, the active substance of which is a complex of water-soluble biologically active peptides isolated from bovine prostate, in combined treatment of chronic bacterial and abacterial prostatitis in patients of all ages including those with concomitant adenoma. Current comparative clinical trial has shown that Vitaprost tablets in combination with nonsteroid anti-inflammatory drugs effectively treat prostatic inflammation in patients with chronic abacterial prostatitis, produce more potent and stable effect than monotherapy with ketonal. The absence of side effects and negative alterations in clinical and biochemical blood and urine parameters evidences for good tolerance and safety of Vitaprost tablets. Vitaprost tablets can be used in therapy of chronic abacterial prostatitis for raising efficacy of the standard treatment in patients of different ages and having associated diseases.Pregabalin for chronic prostatitis.Chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome (CP/CPPS) is a condition that is detrimental to the quality of life of men. Evidence suggests that it may have a neuropathic origin and therefore medications such as pregabalin might have a role in the controlling of symptoms.The primary objective was to compare pregabalin to other modalities of pain relief to alleviate men's symptoms of CP/CPPS.The secondary objective was to assess the safety and effectiveness of pregabalin to improve various individual symptoms consistent with CP/CPPS.We searched the Cochrane Central Register of Controlled Trials (CENTRAL), MEDLINE (1966 to May 2012), EMBASE (1980 to May 2012), CINAHL, clinicaltrials.gov, Google Scholar, and reference lists of articles and abstracts from conference proceedings, without language restriction for pregabalin treatment of Class III prostatitis and CP/CPPS.Randomized controlled trials (RCTs) comparing pregabalin to placebo or other types of analgesics for the management of patients with CP/CPPS were included. Patients with known causes of pain/discomfort were excluded.Only one RCT was included. The trial compared pregabalin to placebo for patients who had CP/CPPS.For men who responded clinically (≥ 6-point improvement), there was no difference between the pregabalin (103/218; 47.2%) and placebo (38/106; 35.8%) arms (risk ratio (RR) 1.32; 95% CI 0.99 to 1.76). There was less pain with a higher point improvement in the pregabalin group compared to the placebo group (4.2 points versus 1.7 points, respectively; mean difference (MD) -2.3 points; 95% CI -4.0 to -0.7 points).Though 59% (191/324) of the patients developed side effects, no serious effects were experienced. There were significantly more neurologic side effects in the pregabalin group compared to the placebo group (38.5% (84/218) versus 22.6% (24/106), respectively; RR 1.7; 95% CI 1.15 to 2.51), and less pain in the pregabalin group than in the placebo group (17.4% (38/218) versus 33.3% (35/106), respectively; RR 0.53; 95% CI 0.36 to 0.78). However, no significant differences were seen between the pregabalin and placebo groups with regards to gastrointestinal disturbances (18.3% (40/218) versus 18.9% (20/106), respectively; RR 0.97; 95% CI 0.60 to 1.58), ocular/visual symptoms (6.9% (15/218) versus 2.8% (3/106), respectively; RR 2.43; 95% CI 0.72 to 8.22), and renal/genitourinary symptoms (5.5% (12/218) versus 1.9% (2/106), respectively; RR 3.03; 95% CI 0.67 to 13.79).There is evidence from one RCT that pregabalin does not improve CP/CPPS symptoms and causes adverse effects in a large percentage of men. However, research is required to assess further whether pregabalin has a role in patients with CP/CPPS for symptom control.[Longidase in the treatment of chronic prostatitis].Twenty eight patients with documented chronic prostatitis (CP) received standard therapy (a control group) while a study group of 28 patients received standard therapy plus a 10 longidase injections in a dose of 3000 IU. Treatment results showed that longidase is highly effective in bacterial and abacterial CP. Longidase addition to standard therapeutic methods significantly reduced the disease symptoms and regression of inflammatory-proliferative alterations in the prostate. Thus, a domestic drug longidase is effective and safe in CP. It can be widely used in combined therapy of CP.[Vitaprost efficacy in patients with chronic abacterial prostatitis].We studied efficacy of a new cytomedine drug--vitaprost--in 98 patients with chronic abacterial prostatitis. Vitaprost was found to relieve symptoms of the disease, improved blood flow in the prostate, normalized blood rheology and immunological indices, increased mobility of spermatozoa in ejaculate.Lower urinary tract symptoms, pain and quality of life assessment in chronic non-bacterial prostatitis patients treated with alpha-blocking agent doxazosin; versus placebo.The efficacy of doxazosin monotherapy in chronic non-bacterial prostatitis was investigated in terms of urinary symptom, pain and quality of life assessment versus placebo. A total of 60 men with chronic non-bacterial prostatitis were randomised to daily supplement of 4 mg doxazosin or a placebo, for 3 months. International Prostate Symptom Score (IPSS) questionnaire was self administered at the entry and at 3 months after the cessation of the treatment. In addition, patients were asked to complete 2-item questionnaire on pain related symptoms of chronic prostatitis. Quality of life was assessed with a single item included in IPSS. Three months after cessation of the treatment there was a significant difference between the overall mean IPSS, pain and quality of life scores of the two groups in favour of alpha-blocking agent use (p = 0.001, p < 0.001 and p < 0.001, respectively). In patients undergone doxazosin treatment; symptom, pain and quality of life status revealed 32.94 +/- 5.27%, 36.57 +/- 5.67% and 36.78 +/- 4.75% overall improvement, respectively. IPSS appeared to be a valuable tool in assessing treatment outcome of chronic non-bacterial prostatitis.Contemporary Management of Chronic Prostatitis/Chronic Pelvic Pain Syndrome.Chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome (CP/CPPS) is a common condition that causes severe symptoms, bother, and quality-of-life impact in the 8.2% of men who are believed to be affected. Research suggests a complex pathophysiology underlying this syndrome that is mirrored by its heterogeneous clinical presentation. Management of patients diagnosed with CP/CPPS has always been a formidable task in clinical practice. Due to its enigmatic etiology, a plethora of clinical trials failed to identify an efficient monotherapy.A comprehensive review of published randomized controlled trials (RCTs) on the treatment of CP/CPPS and practical best evidence recommendations for management.Medline and the Cochrane database were screened for RCTs on the treatment of CP/CPPS from 1998 to December 2014, using the National Institutes of Health Chronic Prostatitis Symptom Index as an objective outcome measure. Published data in concert with expert opinion were used to formulate a practical best evidence statement for the management of CP/CPPS.Twenty-eight RCTs identified were eligible for this review and presented. Trials evaluating antibiotics, α-blockers, anti-inflammatory and immune-modulating substances, hormonal agents, phytotherapeutics, neuromodulatory drugs, agents that modify bladder function, and physical treatment options failed to reveal a clear therapeutic benefit. With its multifactorial pathophysiology and its various clinical presentations, the management of CP/CPPS demands a phenotypic-directed approach addressing the individual clinical profile of each patient. Different categorization algorithms have been proposed. First studies applying the UPOINTs classification system provided promising results. Introducing three index patients with CP/CPPS, we present practical best evidence recommendations for management.Our current understanding of the pathophysiology underlying CP/CPPS resulting in this highly variable syndrome does not speak in favor of a monotherapy for management. No efficient monotherapeutic option is available. The best evidence-based management of CP/CPPS strongly suggests a multimodal therapeutic approach addressing the individual clinical phenotypic profile.Chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome presents a variable syndrome. Successful management of this condition is challenging. It appears that a tailored treatment strategy addressing individual patient characteristics is more effective than one single therapy.Efficacy of extracorporeal shock wave therapy for the treatment of chronic pelvic pain syndrome: a randomized, controlled trial.Objectives. To investigate the effectiveness of extracorporeal shock wave therapy (ESWT) for symptoms alleviation in chronic pelvic pain syndrome (CPPS). Materials and Methods. 40 patients with CPPS were randomly allocated into either the treatment or sham group. In the first group, patients were treated by ESWT once a week for 4 weeks by a defined protocol. In the sham group, the same protocol was applied but with the probe being turned off. The follow-up assessments were done at 1, 2, 3, and 12 weeks by Visual Analogue Scale (VAS) for pain and NIH-developed Chronic Prostatitis Symptom Index (NIH-CPSI). Results. Pain domain scores at follow-up points in both treatment and sham groups were reduced, more so in the treatment group, which were significant at weeks 2, 3, and 12. Urinary scores became significantly different at weeks 3 and 12. Also, quality of life (QOL) and total NIH-CPSI scores at all four follow-up time points reduced more significantly in the treatment group as compared to the sham group. Noticeably, at week 12 a slight deterioration in all variables was observed compared to the first 3 weeks of the treatment period. Conclusions. our findings confirmed ESWT therapy as a safe and effective method in CPPS in short term. [Long-term effects of osteopathic treatment of chronic prostatitis with chronic pelvic pain syndrome: a 5-year follow-up of a randomized controlled trial and considerations on the pathophysiological context].The etiology of chronic prostatitis chronic pelvic pain syndrome (CP/CPPS) is still unclear. As no pathological findings exist the diagnosis of CP/CPPS is essentially a diagnosis by exclusion and functional disorders, so-called somatoform disorders play a more important role. Osteopathy treats functional disorders of the musculoskeletal system including all associated internal organs but little attention has so far been paid to this treatment method. Therefore, the 5-year follow-up period was intended to show that this is a sustainable form of therapy using exclusively manual and gentle techniques and simple treatment procedures resulting in manageable costs.The aim of this study was to investigate whether sustainability of osteopathic treatment could be demonstrated even after 5 years. This was a randomized controlled study initially involving 5 treatment sessions, a follow-up without treatment after 6 weeks and further follow-up after 1.5 and 5 years. Of the 20 patients 19 in the test group participated in the 5-year follow-up. The control group were not asked because it would have been unacceptable to expect the patients to refrain from having treatment for as long as 5 years. The men were aged between 29 and 70 years. The patients were asked to complete the international prostate symptom score (IPSS), the National Institutes of Health chronic prostatitis symptom index (NIH-CPSI) and the quality of life (QOL) questionnaires once again and in particular to state whether they had received osteopathic treatment specifically for the prostate problem and how often they had been treated.The follow-up assessment of the symptoms of chronic prostatitis (NIH-CPSI) showed that they had further improved after 1.5 years (intragroup difference -1.8 points, 95 % confidence interval CI=-3.8 to 0.3) and also after 5 years (intragroup difference -1.3 points 95 % CI=-3.4 to 0.8). The urinary tract symptoms (IPSS) showed a statistically significant improvement (intergroup difference 8.9 points, 95 % CI=4.7-13.1, p<0.0005). At the second follow-up after 1.5 years there was a further improvement (intragroup difference -2.2 points, 95% CI=-3.9 to -0.4, p=0.02) which was found to remain constant after 5 years (intragroup difference 0.2 points). The quality of life (QOL) with respect to the symptoms showed a statistically significant improvement in comparing both groups during the study phase (intergroup difference χ 2: p<0.005). At follow-up after 5 years out of 19 patients 15 answered the question"how would you feel if the symptoms currently present would not change in the future?" with excellent or satisfactory and 11 patients would not have wanted further osteopathic treatment. Of the patients 8 reported that since the second follow-up (within 3.5 years) they had received osteopathic treatment one to eight times; however, this was partially more prophylactic than due to pain.Due to the sustainability of osteopathic treatment and the low amount of time involved, osteopathy should be taken seriously as a treatment for patients with CP/CPPS. Furthermore, due to the osteopathic treatment the patients learnt to alleviate or even eliminate their own symptoms in treating themselves. In order to help many other affected persons out of their dilemma it would be desirable if more urologists and internists would become acquainted with osteopathy in order to be able to offer this to patients at an early stage. Further studies with larger numbers of patients should be carried out to confirm these results.Electroacupuncture relieves pain in men with chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome: three-arm randomized trial.To investigate the clinical effect of electroacupuncture (EA) for chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome (CP/CPPS).We recruited 63 participants meeting the U.S. National Institutes of Health (NIH) consensus criteria for CP/CPPS. After the inclusion/exclusion criteria were applied, 39 men were randomized to 3 treatment groups: group 1, advice and exercise plus 12 sessions of EA; group 2, advice and exercise plus 12 sessions of sham EA (SEA); and group 3, advice and exercise alone (A&E) for 6 weeks. A total of 6 acupuncture points were used to stimulate the sacral nerve and release the piriformis muscle using an electrical pulse generator. Symptoms related to CP/CPPS were assessed using the NIH-Chronic Prostatitis Symptom Index (NIH-CPSI). Prostaglandin E(2) and beta-endorphin levels in postmassage urine samples were measured using an enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay.At 6 weeks, the NIH-CPSI total score had decreased significantly in the EA group compared with the SEA and A&E groups (P < .001). On a subscale analysis of the NIH-CPSI, the EA group showed significant decreases in pain-related symptoms compared with the SEA and A&E groups (P < .01). All 12 EA participants experienced at least a 6-point decrease in the NIH-CPSI total score compared with 2 of 12 SEA participants (16.7%) and 3 of 12 A&E participants (25.0%; P < .0001). The mean prostaglandin E(2) level in the postmassage urine samples had significantly decreased in the EA group (P = .023). In contrast, it had increased in the other 2 groups.In a 3-arm randomized trial investigating the clinical effects of EA on CP/CPPS, EA therapy proved to have independent therapeutic effects, particularly for pain relief superior to SEA or A&E therapy.[Associating Serenoa repens, Urtica dioica and Pinus pinaster. Safety and efficacy in the treatment of lower urinary tract symptoms. Prospective study on 320 patients].Serenoa repens (saw palmetto) has been employed for the treatment of lower urinary tract symptoms (LUTS) for several years. Its mechanism of action is believed to be due to antiandrogenic, antiproliferative and antinflammatory properties. An association of Serenoa with the nettle "Urtica dioica" showing antiproliferative activity and the pine "Pinus pinaster" derivative, showing antinflammatory action, has been proposed in recent years. Such an action is hoped to act not only by reducing LUTS but also by preventing the development of prostate cancer.During the years 2007 and 2008, 320 patients suffering from LUTS were treated with an association of Serenoa repens 320 mg, Urtica dioica 120 mg and Pinus pinaster 5 mg, named IPBTRE. This treatment was administered to all patients for a minimal duration of 30 days to a maximum of a year, either alone or in association with antibiotics or alpha-blockers, if needed. Outcome analysis was based on evaluation of symptoms, prostate volume and maximum flow rate (Qmax).From a careful analysis of the data collected in our database, the following observations can be made: ages varied between 19 and 78 years. The patients were affected by BPH in 46% of cases, chronic prostatitis syndrome in 43%, chronic genital-pelvic pain in 7% and other conditions in 4%, the absolute numbers being 147, 138, 22 and 7 patients, respectively. No untoward side effect was reported in any case. Variations in symptom score could be fully evaluated only in 80 of 320 patients (25%), of whom 68 (85%) reported a significant benefit, with special reference to an improvement of pain, urgency, strangury and nocturia. Data on variations in prostate volume, as measured by digital rectal examination, were available in 84 (26.5%) patients. No significant change was observed. Qmax after treatment was measured in 83 (26%) patients. It did not show significant changes from the initial values.The association tested in our study appeared to be safe and well tolerated. No changes in flow rate and prostate volume were observed, but a marked reduction of LUTS was observed in 85% of evaluable cases, especially with regard to pain and irritative symptoms. Whether or not such an association may display a prevention of prostate cancer, may be investigated in additional studies.Extracorporeal shock wave treatment for non-inflammatory chronic pelvic pain syndrome: a prospective, randomized and sham-controlled study.Chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome (CP/CPPS) is a clinical syndrome characterized by pain in the perineum, pelvis, suprapubic area, or external genitalia and variable degrees of voiding and ejaculatory disturbance. The analgesic effect of extracorporeal shock wave treatment (ESWT) was an interesting phenomenon with an unclear mechanism discovered by chance in the applications for urolithiasis, on which ESWT has become an increasingly popular therapeutic approach as an alternative option for the treatment of a number of soft tissue complaints. In this study, we aimed to evaluate the feasibility and efficacy of ESWT in non-inflammatory (IIIB) CP/CPPS.Men diagnosed with IIIB CP/CPPS were randomized to either ESWT (group 1, n = 40) or the control (group 2, n = 40). Group 1 received 20 000 shock wave impulses in 10 sessions over a two-week period, whereas group 2 received only a sham procedure. The total scores and sub-domain scores of the National Institutes of Health Chronic Prostatitis Symptom Index (NIH-CPSI) for both groups were assessed at baseline, mid-treatment, end-point, and 4-week and 12-week follow-up visits.The mean total NIH-CPSI score of group 1 was significantly decreased from baseline at all post-treatment time points (P < 0.01 for all). Decreases in pain domain and quality of life (QOL) scores were also significant. In group 2, no significant decreases of total NIH-CPSI score and pain domain score were found at all post-treatment time points. At the end-point of treatment, 71.1% of group 1 exhibited perceptible improvement in total NIH-CPSI compared with 27.0% of group 2 (P < 0.001); additionally, 28.9% of group 1 exhibited clinically significant improvement compared with 10.8% of group 2 (P < 0.01). Moreover, a greater number of patients in group 1 at 4-week and 12-week follow-up were rated as responders (perceptible and clinically significant response) compared with group 2.ESWT exhibits a potentially therapeutic role in the treatment of CP/CPPS.Treatment of chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome category IIIA with Serenoa repens plus selenium and lycopene (Profluss) versus S. repens alone: an Italian randomized multicenter-controlled study.To evaluate the efficacy and safety of Serenoa repens + selenium and lycopene (Profluss) versus S. repens alone for the treatment of category IIIa chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome (CP/CPPS).102 patients with IIIa CP/CPPS were enrolled and randomized into two groups each to receive Profluss or S. repens alone for 8 weeks. Evaluation was based on results of the National Institutes of Health-Chronic Prostatitis Symptom Index (NIH-CPSI), IPSS, maximum peak flow rate (MPFR), and PSA measurements at baseline and at weeks 4, 8 and 8 after the end of treatment. The primary endpoint was a >50% reduction in NIH-CPSI score. Secondary endpoints evaluated were MPFR, IPSS, PSA and white blood cell count.No patients withdrew from the study. The mean NIH-CPSI score decreased significantly (p < 0.001) in both groups; we observed a decrease in the total score from 27.45 to 13.27 in group 1 (-51.64%) and from 27.76 to 20.62 in group 2 (-26.06%). IPSS improved significantly (p < 0.001) in both arms, but more in group 1. PSA and white blood cell count decreased significantly (p < 0.007) only in group 1. The MPFR improved more in group 1 (p < 0.005).Profluss is a triple therapy that is safe and well tolerated. It ameliorates symptoms associated with IIIa CP/CPPS.Acupuncture relieves symptoms in chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome: a randomized, sham-controlled trial.There are multiple approaches to the management of chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome (CP/CPPS); and lately the data suggesting the ability of acupuncture treatment to decrease pain, positively impact quality of life and potentially modulate inflammation has suggested it as a potential therapeutic option for men with CP/CPPS. We conducted this study to determine whether acupuncture is really an effective therapeutic modality for CP/CPPS in terms of >50% decrease in total National Institutes of Health Chronic Prostatitis Symptom Index (NIH-CPSI) score from baseline compared with sham.One hundred patients with CP/CPPS (category III B) in an outpatient urology clinic were randomized to receive acupuncture at either seven acupoints bilaterally or sham points adjacent to these points. NIH-CPSI was completed by each patient before and 6, 8, 16, 24 weeks after the treatment. Mean values of total CPSI score and subscores after the treatment and on follow-up following the treatment were compared.Of the acupuncture participants, 92% were NIH-CPSI responders (>50% decrease in total NIH-CPSI score from baseline) compared with 48% of sham participants, 8 weeks after the end of the therapy. Both groups experienced significant decrease in CPSI subscores throughout the whole follow-up period; however, the decline remained significantly greater in the active acupuncture group as compared with the sham group.Our results show that the use of acupuncture in treatment of men with CP/CPPS symptoms resulted in a significant decrease in total NIH-CPSI scores.[Efficacy observation on chronic pelvic pain syndrome of damp-heat stagnation pattern treated with acupoint catgut embedding therapy].To compare the efficacy difference in the treatment of chronic pelvic pain syndrome of Sev-damp-heat stagnation pattern between acupoint catgut embedding therapy and western medication.enty cases were randomized into a catgut embedding group (40 cases) and a western medication group (30 cases) at the ratio of 4 : 3. In the catgut embedding group, the catgut embedding therapy was applied to Sanyinjiao (SP 6), Quchi (LI 11), Huiyin (CV 1), Zusanli (ST 36), Zhongji (CV 3), Shenshu (BL 23), etc. The treatment was given once every two weeks, the treatment for 4 weeks was as one session and totally 2 sessions were required. In the western medication group, tamsulosin hydrochloride capsules 0. 2 mg, oral administration, once a day, and Indometacin sustained release tablets, 75 mg, once a day, 3 tablets each time were prescribed. The symptom score of TCM, score of NIH Chronic Prostatitis Symptom Index (NIH-CPSI), lecithin body number in prostatic fluid, (SAS) score of Self-Rating Anxiety Scale and score of Self-Rating Depression Scale (SDS) were compared before and after treatment in the patients of the two groups. The efficacy was evaluated in the two groups.(1)The total effective rate was 91. 9% (34/37) in the catgutembedding group and was 86. 2% (25/29) in the western medication group. The efficacy in the catgutembedding group was better than that in the western medication group (P<0. 05). (2) The symptom score of TCM was all reduced significantly after treatment in the two groups (both P<0.01), and the result in the catgut embedding group was superior to the western medication group (6.42 +/-2. 81 vs 10. 99+/-3. 11 ,P<0. 01). (3) Lecithin body number was increased apparently in the two groups after treatment (both P<0.01), and the result in the catgut-embedding group was superior to the western medicine group (33.56+/-5.88 vs 29. 78+/-7. 06,P<0. 05). (4) Total score of NIH-CPSI, score of pain, score of SAS and score of SDS were all improved apparently after treatment in the two groups (all P<0. 01), and the results in the catgut embedding group were superior to the western medication group (P<0. 01, P<0. 05).The acupoint catgut embedding therapy achieves the superior efficacy on chronic pelvic pain syndrome of damp-heat stagnation pattern as compared with conventional western medicine. This therapy relieves clinical symptoms, improves the states of anxiety and depression and increases lecithin body number obviously.Review of results of four regimens for treatment of chronic non-bacterial prostatitis.Review of the treatment of chronic non-bacterial prostatitis, defined by the presence of more than 500 leucocytes per mm3 in the expressed prostatic secretion (EPS), showed symptomatic response after 3 months of minocycline, trimethoprim, co-trimoxazole or diazepam. Reduction in the EPS cell count was most marked with minocycline, trimethoprim was less effective and poor results were obtained with co-trimoxazole and diazepam. In the absence of established treatment for chronic non-bacterial prostatitis it is suggested that antimicrobial therapy is worth consideration.Re: Transurethral microwave thermotherapy for nonbacterial prostatitis: a randomized double-blind sham controlled study using new prostatitis specific assessment questionnaires.[Clinical research of chronic pelvic cavity pain syndrome treated with acupoint catgut embedding therapy].To explore the clinical efficacy of acupoint catgut embedding therapy on chronic pelvic cavity pain syndrome differentiated as kidney deficiency and stagnation of damp heat, and explore the impacts on plasma P substance (SP), plasma beta-endorphin (β-EP).One hundred and eighty cases were randomly divided into a catgut embedding group (90 cases) and a western medication group (90 cases). In the western medication group, tamsulosin capsules 0. 2 mg were prescribed for oral administration, once a day; indometacin sustained release tablets, 25 mg, three times a day. Totally, the oral administration for 8 weeks was required. In the catgut embedding group, the acupoint catgut embedding therapy was applied to Qugu (CV 2), Shenshu (BL 23), Zhibian (BL 54), Huiyin (CV 1) and Sanyinjiao (SP 6), once every two weeks; the treatment of 4 weeks made one session, and two sessions were required. Before and after treatment, TCM symptom score, NIH-CPSI (the National Institute of Health Chronic Prostatitis Symptom Index) score, lecithin body numbers in prostatic fluid, score in SAS (self-rating anxiety scale), score in SDS (self-rating depression scale), the levels of SP and β-EP, etc. were observed in the two groups, and the clinical efficacy was assessed in the two groups.(1) Ten cases were dropped in either group. The total effective rate was 91. 25% (73/80) in the catgut embedding group, higher than 78. 75% (63/80) in the western medication group (P<0. 05). (2) After treatment, TCM symptom score, total score in NIH-CPSI, pain score and the scores in SAS and SDS were all reduced as compared with those before treatment in the two groups (all P<0. 05). After treatment, TCM symptom score, total score and pain score in NIH-CPSI, and the scores in SAS and SDS in the catgut embedding group were both lower than those in the western medication group (all P<0. 05). (3) After treatment, the lecithin body numbers were both increased as compared with those before treatment in the two groups (both P<0. 05), and the result in the catgut embedding group was higher than that in the western medication group (P<0. 05). (4)After treatment, the SP level was lower than that before treatment in the two groups (both P<0. 05); the level of p-EP was increased as compared with that before treatment (both P<0. 05). The SP level in the catgut embedding group was lower than that in the western medication group (P<0. 05); the level of β-EP was higher than that in the western medication group (P<0. 05).The acupoint catgut embedding therapy apparently relieves the clinical symptoms of chronic pelvic cavity pain syndrome differentiated as kidney deficiency and stagnation of damp heat as well as the condition of anxiety and depression, increases lecithin body numbers in prostatic fluid and β-EP level and reduces SP level.α-blockers, antibiotics and anti-inflammatories have a role in the management of chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome.Study Type - Therapy (systematic review) Level of Evidence 1a. What's known on the subject? and What does the study add? Individual clinical trials evaluating antibiotics, anti-inflammatories and α-blockers for the treatment of chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome have shown only modest or even no benefits for patients compared with placebo, yet we continue to use these agents in selected patients with some success in clinical practice. This network meta-analysis of current evidence from all available randomized placebo-controlled trials with similar inclusion criteria and outcome measures shows that these '3-As' of chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome treatment (antibiotics, anti-inflammatories and α-blockers) do offer benefits to some patients, particularly if we use them strategically in selected individuals.To provide an updated network meta-analysis mapping α-blockers, antibiotics and anti-inflammatories (the 3-As) in chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome (CP/CPPS). • To use the results of this meta-analysis to comment on the role of the 3-As in clinical practice.We updated a previous review including only randomized controlled studies employing the National Institutes of Health Chronic Prostatitis Symptom Index (NIH-CPSI) as one of the outcomes to compare treatment effects in CP/CPPS patients. • A longitudinal mixed regression model (network meta-analysis) was applied to indirectly assess multiple treatment comparisons (i.e. α-blockers, antibiotics, anti-inflammatory/immune modulation therapies, α-blockers plus antibiotics, and placebo).Nineteen studies (1669 subjects) were eligible for analysis. • α-blockers, antibiotics and anti-inflammatory/immune modulation therapies were associated with significant improvement in symptoms when compared with placebo, with mean differences of total CPSI of -10.8 (95% CI -13.2 to -8.3; P < 0.001), -9.7 (95% CI -14.2 to -5.3; P < 0.001) and -1.7 (95% CI -3.2 to -0.2; P= 0.032) respectively, while α-blockers plus antibiotics resulted in the greatest CPSI difference (-13.6, 95% CI -16.7 to -10.6; P < 0.001). • With respect to responder analysis compared with placebo, anti-inflammatories showed the greatest response rates (risk ratio 1.7, 95% CI 1.4-2.1; P < 0.001) followed by α-blockers (risk ratio 1.4, 95% CI 1.1-1.8; P= 0.013) and antibiotics (risk ratio 1.2, 95% CI 0.7-1.9; P= 0.527).α-blockers, antibiotics and/or anti-inflammatory/immune modulation therapy appear to be beneficial for some patients with CP/CPPS. • The magnitude of effect and the disconnect between mean CPSI decrease and response rates compared with placebo suggest that directed multimodal therapy, rather than mono-therapy, with these agents should be considered for optimal management of CP/CPPS.More effects of extracorporeal magnetic innervation and terazosin therapy than terazosin therapy alone for non-inflammatory chronic pelvic pain syndrome: a pilot study.The objective of this study was to evaluate whether extracorporeal magnetic innervation (ExMI) combined with alpha-blocker therapy is more effective than alpha-blocker monotherapy for patients with non-inflammatory chronic prostatitis (CP)/chronic pelvic pain syndrome (CPPS), category IIIB. Patients were randomized to either terazosin monotherapy (group 1, n=21) or terazosin combined with ExMI therapy (group 2, n=19). Patients in group 2 had 12 treatment sessions of ExMI twice a week during 6 weeks. None of the patients experienced any side effects from treatment. The changes in each domain of the National Institutes of Health (NIH)-Chronic Prostatitis Symptom Index (CPSI) measured on week 6 were not significantly different between the groups. However, the difference (median, 25-75th percentiles) between the two groups in total NIH-CPSI scores was -4 (-11.5, -2) for group 1 and -12 (-17.3, -2.3) for group 2, respectively (P=0.047). At 6 weeks, 47.6% (10 of 21) of group 1 had a >25% decrease in total NIH-CPSI compared with 78.9% (15 of 19) of group 2 (P=0.041). Also, more patients in group 2 (78.9%) were rated as responders with a 6-point decrease in NIH-CPSI compared with group 1 (47.6%) (P=0.041). The early results suggest that ExMI combined with alpha-blocker therapy has better effect than alpha-blocker monotherapy for the treatment of CP/CPPS.Transcutaneous electrical nerve stimulation (TENS) in the symptomatic management of chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome: a placebo-control randomized trial.The aim of the study was to investigate the therapeutic efficacy of transcutaneous electrical nerve stimulation (TENS) in the symptomatic management of chronic prostatitis pain/chronic pelvic pain syndrome.A pretest, posttest randomized double blind design was used in data collection.Twenty-four patients diagnosed with chronic prostatitis- category IIIA and IIIB of the National Institute of Health Chronic Pain (NIH-CP) were referred for physiotherapy from the Urology department.Pre treatment pain level was assessed using the NIH-CP (pain domain) index. The TENS group received TENS treatment, 5 times per week for a period of 4 weeks (mean treatment frequency, intensity, pulse width and duration of 60 Hz, 100 microS, 25 mA and 20 minutes respectively). The Analgesic group received no TENS treatment but continued analgesics; the Control group received no TENS and Analgesic but placebo. All subjects were placed on antibiotics throughout the treatment period.Post-treatment pain level was also assessed using NIH-CP pain index.Findings of the study revealed significant effect of TENS on chronic prostatitis pain at p < 0.05.TENS is an effective means of non-invasive symptomatic management of chronic prostatitis pain.Diagnosis and treatment of chronic abacterial prostatitis: a systematic review.The optimal management of chronic abacterial prostatitis is not known. A systematic review of the literature was done to answer the following questions: Are there accurate, reliable tests to diagnose chronic abacterial prostatitis? Are there effective therapies for it?Studies were identified by searching MEDLINE (1966 to 1999), the Cochrane Library, and bibliographies of identified articles and reviews and by contacting an expertDiagnostic test articles were included if they reported on controlled studies; treatment articles were included if they reported on randomized or controlled trials. No language restrictions were applied.For each selected article, two investigators independently extracted key data on study design, patient characteristics, diagnostic test or treatment characteristics, and outcomes.19 diagnostic test articles and 14 treatment trials met the inclusion criteria The disparity among studies in design, interventions, and other factors precluded quantitative analysis or pooling of the findings. Diagnostic test articles included 1384 men (mean age, 33 to 67 years) and evaluated infection; inflammation, immunology, and biochemistry; psychological factors; and ultrasonography. Treatment trials included 570 men (mean age, 38 to 45 years) and evaluated medications used to treat benign prostatic hyperplasia, anti-inflammatory drugs, antibiotics, thermotherapy, and miscellaneous medications. No trial was done in the United States.There is no gold-standard diagnostic test for chronic abacterial prostatitis, and the methodologic quality of available studies of diagnostic tests is low. The few treatment trials are methodologically weak and involved small samples. The routine use of antibiotics and alpha-blockers to treat chronic abacterial prostatitis is not supported by the existing evidence.The effect of alpha-adrenergic antagonists in chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome: a meta-analysis of randomized controlled trials.The effectiveness of alpha-adrenergic antagonists on patients with chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome (CP/CPPS) has not been supported by well-evaluated study. The meta-analysis was performed to supply the best evidence about use of this class of drugs in CP/CPPS. A fully recursive literature search to June 2005 was conducted in PubMed, EMBASE, the Cochrane Controlled Trials Register, and the Chinese Biomedicine Database to identify potentially relevant randomized controlled trials. RevMan4.2 was used for statistical analysis. Nine studies with 734 patients were included. Combined analysis showed a significant reduction of total NIH-CPSI or I-PSS in patients with treatment duration of more than 3 months. There were also valuable results in urinary symptom alleviation. Alpha-adrenergic antagonists did not show benefit in pain. The meta-analysis revealed that the use of alpha-adrenergic antagonists was warranted in CP/CPPS, and the treatment duration should be long enough (more than 3 months).[Observation on therapeutic effect of warm needle moxibustion on chronic non-bacterial prostatitis].To observe the therapeutic effect of warm needle moxibustion on chronic non-bacterial prostatitis.One hundred and twenty-five cases were randomly divided into a warm needle moxibustion group (n = 42), an acupuncture group (n = 41) and a western medicine group (n = 42). The warm needle moxibustion group was treated with acupuncture at Shenshu (BL 23), Ganshu (BL 18), Zhibian (BL 54) with no retention of the needles, and warm needle moxibustion on Guanyuan (CV 4), Zhongji (CV 3), Yinlingquan (SP 9), Sanyin-jiao (SP 6), once daily; the acupuncture group with acupuncture at the same acupoints as the warm needle moxibus tion group with no moxibustion; and the western medicine group with oral administration of Prostat Tablets, one tablet each time, twice daily. The therapeutic effects and scores of chronic prostatitis symptom indexes (NIH-CPSI) were compared.The total effective rate was 88.10% in the warm needle moxibustion group, 63.41% in the acupuncture group and 66.67% in the western medicine group, the warm needle moxibustion group being better than the acupuncture group and the western medicine group (both P < 0.05). After treatment, the scores of NIH-CPSI was 11.92 +/- 7.11 in the warm needle moxibustion group, 16.08 +/- 6.83 in the acupuncture group and 15.66 +/- 5.88 in the western medicine group, with significant decreases in the 3 groups as compared with those before treatment (all P < 0.01), and after treatment, the score in the warm needle moxibustion group was significant different to that of the acupuncture group or the western medicine group (both P < 0.01).The warm needle moxibustion has a good therapeutic effect on chronic non-bacterial prostatitis.Acupuncture and immune function in chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome: a randomized, controlled study.The immune system has been implicated as one mechanism underlying the benefits of acupuncture therapy. Evidence suggests that acupuncture can ameliorate symptoms of chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome (CP/CPPS), but the association between clinical response and the immune system has not been investigated.We investigated 12 CP/CPPS patients participating in a prospective randomized clinical trial comparing acupuncture versus sham acupuncture for effects on cellular immunity. Blood samples were taken before the first needling and after the last of 20 treatment sessions (week 10). Patients also completed questionnaires examining their CP/CPPS symptoms and mood status at the baseline and end of study visits.At the end of study 8 of 12 participants (67%) were classified as treatment responders, four participants each from the acupuncture and sham groups. The acupuncture group averaged a 5% increase in natural killer cell levels compared to corresponding sham (-13%; p=0.03). Similarly, patients randomized to acupuncture reported a reduction in other white blood cell parameters examined, supporting the possibility that immunity might be important in the pathophysiology of CP/CPPS.The specific effect of acupuncture on CP/CPPS remains unclear. Further research is warranted to examine the mechanisms by which acupuncture therapy may improve clinical symptoms in patients with CP/CPPS.ClinicalTrials.gov number, NCT00260637).Systematic Review of Acupuncture for Chronic Prostatitis/Chronic Pelvic Pain Syndrome.Acupuncture is a promising therapy for relieving symptoms in chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome (CP/CPPS), which affects >15% of adult men worldwide. The aim of the study was to assess the effects and safety of the use of acupuncture for CP/CPPS. MEDLINE, EMBASE, CENTRAL, Web of Science, CBM, CNKI, Wang-Fang Database, JCRM, and CiNii were searched from their inception through 30 November 2015. Grey literature databases and websites were also searched. No language limits were applied. Only randomized controlled trials (RCTs) with CP/CPPS treated by acupuncture were included. Two reviewers extracted data and assessed the risk of bias of RCTs using the Cochrane Risk of Bias Tools, respectively. Seven trials were included, involving 471 participants. The result of meta-analysis indicated that compared with sham acupuncture (MD: -6.09 [95%CI: -8.12 to -5.68]) and medicine (Levofloxacinand, Ibuprofen, and Tamsulosin) (MD: -4.57 [95%CI: -7.58 to -1.56]), acupuncture was more effective at decreasing the total NIH-CPSI score. Real acupuncture was superior to sham acupuncture in improving symptoms (pain, voiding) and quality of life (Qof) domain subscores. Compared to sham acupuncture and medicine, acupuncture appears to be more effective at improving the global assessment. Two trials found that there is no significant difference between acupuncture and sham acupuncture in decreasing the IPSS score. Acupuncture failed to show more favorable effects in improving both symptoms and the Qof domain compared with medicine. Overall, current evidence supports acupuncture as an effective treatment for CP/CPPS-induced symptoms, particularly in relieving pain. Based on the meta-analysis, acupuncture is superior to sham acupuncture in improving symptoms and Qof. Acupuncture might be similar to medicine (Levofloxacinand, Ibuprofen, and Tamsulosin) in its long-term effects, but evidence was limited due to high ROB among included trials as well as potential heterogeneity. Acupuncture is associated with rare and slightly adverse events. Protocol registration PROSPERO CRD42015027522.[Chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome. Influence of osteopathic treatment - a randomized controlled study].Prostatitis is the most common urological disease in males under [corrected] the age of 50 years old. As bacteria are detected in only <5% of cases the disease can mostly be classified as chronic nonbacterial prostatitis. The symptoms of this problem complex, often described as chronic prostatitis and chronic pelvic pain syndrome (CP-CPPS), seem to be multifactorial so that an improvement can only rarely be achieved with conventional forms of therapy.The aim of this study was to investigate whether osteopathic treatment can influence the symptoms of CP-CPPS (randomized controlled study, 5 sessions, follow-up after 6 weeks and 1.5 years without treatment). The study was carried out in a practice for osteopathy. Patients were recruited by referral from urologists, newspaper articles and lectures on the topic. A total of 35 males with medically diagnosed CP-CPPS aged 29-70 years old took part in the study. Of the patients 20 were allocated to the treatment group and 15 to the placebo group whereby 2 patients had to retire from the study prematurely. Patients in the treatment group received 5 osteopathic treatment sessions separated by 1 week at the beginning and by up to 3 weeks at the end (total period 8 weeks). The osteopathic dysfunctions of the patients were treated according to the principles of osteopathy. The placebo treatment in the control group consisted of a training program with simple gymnastic and physiotherapeutic exercises. Improvements of the complaints by urination (LUTS), chronic pelvic pain (CPPS) and quality of life (QOL) were measured using the questionnaires for international prostate symptom score (IPSS), the National Institutes of Health chronic prostatitis symptom index (NIH-CPSI) and the quality of life index (QOL).Comparison of the results from the osteopathy and placebo groups revealed statistically significant differences in favor of the osteopathy group (p<0.0005). During the study period the average IPSS in the osteopathy group improved from 19.7 to 10.3 points (48%, p<0.0005), the NIH from 26.0 to 12.0 (54%; p<0.0005) and the QOL from 4.4 to 1.9 points (58%, p<0.0005). In contrast the corresponding values in the placebo group remained relatively constant. At the follow-up 6 weeks after the last session the improvements in the osteopathy group were found to be stabile and remained so at least up to the second follow-up after 1.5 years.The positive results of this study indicate that osteopathic treatment can be considered a genuine alternative to the conventional treatment of CP-CPPS and a closer cooperation between urologists/internists and osteopaths would be desirable. Further studies with larger numbers of patients should be carried out to substantiate these results.Effectiveness of acupuncture on chronic prostatitis-chronic pelvic pain syndrome category IIIB patients: a prospective, randomized, nonblinded, clinical trial.To compare the acupuncture treatment and the medical treatment with antibiotics and nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs) on pain control, urinary symptoms, and quality of life of category IIIB chronic prostatitis-chronic pelvic pain syndrome (CP-CPPS).From November 2008 to May 2009, 54 male patients with category IIIB CP-CPPS were randomly divided into 2 groups: the medical treatment group (group 1, n = 28) and the acupuncture treatment group (group 2, n = 26). Group 1 took levofloxacin 500 mg daily and ibuprofen 200 mg twice a day for 6 weeks. In the acupuncture group (group 2), bilateral BL32 (Ciliao) and BL33 (Zhongliao) acupoints were used to stimulate the sacral nerve using an electrical pulse generator, twice a week for 7 weeks. The change in National Institutes of Health Chronic Prostatitis Symptom Index scores from the baseline to the end of the treatment was observed.The mean follow-up was 28 weeks from the baseline (range, 20-43 weeks). In acupuncture group, reduction of pain, urinary symptoms, quality of life, and total National Institutes of Health Chronic Prostatitis Symptom Index score was higher compared with the medical group.However the treatment of CP-CPPS is challenging and difficult for the urologists. This clinical study showed that the acupuncture treatment is a safe and effective treatment of category IIIB CP-CPPS.[Optimal treatment of benign prostatic hyperplasia (BPH) with comorbid chronic prostatitis (category IIIA)].The trial of efficacy of physical factors in combined treatment of BPH stage I patients with concomitant abacterial chronic prostatitis (category IIIA) enrolled 42 patients who were divided into two groups. Group 1 received combined treatment including complex physical factors (CAP-ELM-01). The efficacy of the treatment was judged by dynamics of clinical and device indices and severity of leading CP syndromes. It is shown that physical factors contributed to noticeable improvement in the parameters of prostatic secretion, uroflowmetry, size of the prostate, hemodynamics, clinical manifestations of chronic prostatitis.Long-term effect of extracorporeal shock wave therapy on the treatment of chronic pelvic pain syndrome due to non bacterial prostatitis.There is limited evidence about the chronic pelvic pain syndrome (CPPS) treatment by shockwave therapy, and the aim of this study was to evaluate the effect of extracorporeal shockwave therapy on CPPS due to non bacterial prostatitis in a long-term period.In a follow-up survey, 40 patients with CPPS (that were randomly distributed into the treatment or sham groups were evaluated at 16, 20, and 24 weeks. In the treatment group, patients were treated by extracorporeal shock wave therapy (ESWT) once a week for 4 weeks by a protocol of 3000 impulses, 0.25 mJ/m(2) and 3 Hz of frequency. 0.05 mJ/m(2) were added in each week. In the sham group, the same protocol was applied, but with the probe being turned off. The follow-up assessments were done by visual analog scale for pain and National Institutes of Health-developed Chronic Prostatitis Symptom Index (NIH-CPSI). Data were compared using independent t-test or analysis of variences.Three patients did not complete the study protocol, 37 patients were evlauated (19 patients in treatment and 18 patients in the sham group). At week 24, the mean of pain score, urinary score, quality-of-life and NIH-CPSI score between two groups were not statistically different.Although, ESWT therapy as a safe and effective therapy in CPPS in short-term follow-up has been established, its long-term efficacy was not supported by this study.[Correction of erectile dysfunction in patients with chronic abacterial prostatitis].A total of 76 patients with chronic abacterial prostatitis (CAP) in combination with erectile dysfunction were divided into two groups. Clinical symptoms of CAP and severity of erectile dysfunction were the same in both groups. Patients of the study group (n = 36) received pathogenetic treatment (vitaprost plus physiotherapy) and impase. The control group (n = 40) received vitaprost and physiotherapy. The results of the treatment showed that impase addition to combined treatment of CAP patients with erectile dysfunction significantly improves erectile function: 80.6% patients given impase raised their score by International Index of Erectile Function Scale to normal (26 points and higher). Impase efficacy increased with prolongation of the treatment from 4 to 12 weeks.[Intraprostatic botulinum toxin A injection in chronic prostatitis and chronic pelvic pain syndrome (CP/CPPS)].Interventions for chronic abacterial prostatitis.Chronic abacterial prostatitis is a common disabling but enigmatic condition with a symptom complex of pelvic area pain and lower urinary tract symptoms. The scope of treatments recommended for chronic abacterial prostatitis is a testament to how little is known about what causes the condition and how to treat it. As a result, chronic abacterial prostatitis often causes physician frustration, patient confusion and dissatisfaction, variable thresholds for referral, and potentially inappropriate antibiotic use.Examine the evidence regarding the effectiveness of therapies for chronic abacterial prostatitis.Studies were identified through a search of MEDLINE (1966-2000), the Cochrane Library, bibliographies of identified articles and reviews, and contact with an expert.Studies were eligible if they: (1) are randomized controlled trials (RCTs) or controlled clinical trials (CCTs) (2) involve men with chronic abacterial prostatitis (3) control group receives placebo, sham intervention, active pharmacologic or device therapy for chronic abacterial prostatitis and (4) outcomes data are provided. Eligibility was assessed by at least two independent observers.Study information on patients, interventions, and outcomes was extracted independently by 2 reviewers. The main outcome was the efficacy of treatment for chronic abacterial prostatitis vs. control in improving urologic symptom scale scores or global report of urinary tract symptoms. Secondary outcomes included changes in the prostate examination, uroflowmetry, urodynamics, analysis of urine, expressed prostatic secretions and seminal fluid, and prostate ultrasonography.The 15 treatment trials involved: medications used to treat benign prostatic hyperplasia (n=4 trials); anti-inflammatory medications (n=2 trials); antibiotics (n=1 trial); thermotherapy (n=5 trials); and miscellaneous medications (n=3 trials). The disparity between studies did not permit quantitative analysis. There were a total of 600 enrollees (age range 38-45). All but one of the trials were done outside the United States.The treatment trials are few, weak methodologically, and involve small sample sizes. The routine use of antibiotics and alpha blockers for chronic abacterial prostatitis is not supported by the existing evidence. The small studies examining thermal therapy appear to demonstrate benefit of clinical significance and merit further evaluation. Additional treatment trials are required and they should report important patient characteristics (e.g., race), study design details and utilize clinically relevant and validated assessment measures.[Validity of using physical therapy in combined treatment of chronic prostatitis].To evaluate efficacy of combined physiotherapy in patients with chronic prostatitis (chronic bacterial, chronic abacterial prostatitis), an open comparative trial was made by specialists of the Research Institute of Urology in 2003-2004 of the unit Andro-Gin. Before the treatment, a standard examination was made including analysis of case history and complaints, rectal palpation, questionnaire filling-in, prostatic secretion tests, PCR diagnosis, transrectal ultrasonic scanning and uroflowmetry. In group 1 (chronic bacterial prostatitis) given monotherapy with an etiotropic drug (ED) or combination of ED with Andro-Gin treatment, a significant improvement was achieved by the scale NIH-CPSI, Sorensen scale (p < 0.05). In group 2 (chronic abacterial prostatitis with inflammation) subgroups C,D,E patients showed significant improvement by the scales NIH-CPSI and Sorensen (p < 0.05). The highest symptomatic effect was recorded in the subgroup D in combined treatment with ED and Andro-Gin physiotherapy. In group 3 low NIH-CPSI scale score occurred due to alleviation of pain in subgroup F (p < 0.05), In subgroup G symptoms by the above scales did not change. Uroflowmetry featured moderate dynamics of the increment in maximal voiding speed. Voiding improved significantly in subgroup F in patients with chronic abacterial prostatitis in the absence of inflammation.Dutasteride reduces prostatitis symptoms compared with placebo in men enrolled in the REDUCE study.Men at risk for prostate cancer may concurrently experience chronic prostatitis or pelvic pain. We evaluated the effect of dutasteride on prostatitis-like symptoms in the REDUCE study population.REDUCE was a 4-year, randomized, double-blind, placebo controlled study of prostate cancer risk reduction with 0.5 mg dutasteride vs placebo in men 50 to 75 years old with prostate specific antigen 2.5 to 10 ng/ml and a negative prostate biopsy in the previous 6 months. In this analysis we investigated change from baseline in Chronic Prostatitis Symptom Index in men with prostatitis-like pain (Chronic Prostatitis Symptom Index pain subscore 5 or greater) and prostatitis-like syndrome (perineal or ejaculatory pain plus Chronic Prostatitis Symptom Index pain subscore 4 or greater), the proportion of subjects with at least a moderate Chronic Prostatitis Symptom Index response (6-unit or greater improvement) and reports of new onset clinical prostatitis.Of 5,379 men with a total baseline Chronic Prostatitis Symptom Index score 678 (12.6%) had prostatitis-like pain and 427 (7.9%) had prostatitis-like syndrome. Chronic Prostatitis Symptom Index total score decreased significantly at 48 months in the dutasteride group vs placebo in men with prostatitis-like pain (p <0.0001) and with prostatitis-like syndrome (t test p = 0.03). There were significantly more Chronic Prostatitis Symptom Index responders with dutasteride vs placebo in the prostatitis-like pain (49% vs 37%, respectively, p = 0.0033) and prostatitis-like syndrome (46% vs 35%, Fisher's exact test p = 0.0265) subgroups. Prostatitis was reported as an adverse event by significantly more men randomized to placebo (3.6%) than to dutasteride (2.5%, p = 0.003).Long-term dutasteride therapy resulted in improvement in prostatitis related symptoms in older men with an increased prostate specific antigen.[Observation on therapeutic effect of abdominal cluster-needling on chronic non-bacterial prostatitis].To observe clinical therapeutic effect of abdominal cluster-needling on chronic non-bacterial prostatitis and to probe into indications of abdominal cluster-needling.Eighty-seven cases of chronic nonbacterial prostatitis were randomly divided into an abdominal cluster-needling group (n=44) and a western medicine group (n=43). The abdominal cluster-needling group were treated mainly with abdominal cluster-needling at the 9 stimulating points, i.e. with Zhongji (CV 3) as the center, and each one point on both sides, 2 cun median lateral to anterior superior iliac spine were linked into a pitch arc, which was divided into 4 equal parts each on both sides; the western medicine group were treated with oral administration of Prostat Tablets. Their therapeutic effects were observed.The total effective rate was 100.0% in the abdominal cluster-needling group and 69.8% in the western medicine group with a very significant difference between the two groups (P < 0.01).Abdominal cluster-needling has a better therapeutic effect on chronic non-bacterial prostatitis.[Clinical studies on chronic prostatitis and prostatitis-like syndrome (4). The kampo treatment for intractable prostatitis].Kampo treatment was attempted in cases of chronic nonbacterial prostatitis and prostatitis-like syndrome which was intractable or recurred when treated with western medicine. The clinical effects of Kampo treatment were excellent in 21.3% with an efficacy rate of 67.2% for the cases with chronic non-bacterial prostatitis, and excellent in 19.5% with an efficacy rate of 52.4% in the cases with prostatitis-like syndrome. When the clinical effects were compared with those of western therapy performed in the cases which had recurrence, Kampo treatment showed more excellent effects (p less than 0.1) for both types of disease, and the treatment with Chinese medicine was suggested useful. In a comparison of the effects between the cases given only Kampo treatment and those given both Kampo treatment and western treatment using anti-inflammatory agents, no difference was seen in the cases with the prostatitis-like syndrome, but in the cases with chronic non-bacterial prostatitis, the effects were better in the concomitant treatment group than in the group given only Kampo treatment (p less than 0.1). The response to the Kampo treatment differed depending on the type of disease. Among the antibacterial agents used concomitantly in the cases of chronic non-bacterial prostatitis, new-quinolones showed better results than ST compounds or tetracyclines, but no statistically significant differences were seen among the drugs. Of the Kampo drugs used, Keisibukuryogan and Simotuto showed high clinical usefulness in both types of disease and there was no statistically significant difference among the other drugs. The incidence rate of side effects (Goji) due to Kampo treatment was 6.3% and was higher in patients administered Keisibukuryogan.Therapeutic intervention for chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome (CP/CPPS): a systematic review and meta-analysis.Chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome (CP/CPPS) has been treated with several different interventions with limited success. This meta-analysis aims to review all trials reporting on therapeutic intervention for CP/CPPS using the National Institutes of Health-Chronic Prostatitis Symptom Index (NIH-CPSI).We searched Medline, PubMed, the Cochrane Pain, Palliative & Supportive Care Trials, the Cochrane Register of Controlled Trials, CINAHL, ClinicalTrials.gov, and the NIDDK website between 1947 and December 31, 2011 without language or study type restrictions. All RCTs for CP/CPPS lasting at least 6 weeks, with a minimum of 10 participants per arm, and using the NIH-CPSI score, the criterion standard for CP/CPPS, as an outcome measure were included. Data was extracted from each study by two independent reviewers. Gillbraith and I-squared plots were used for heterogeneity testing and Eggers and Peters methods for publication bias. Quality was assessed using a component approach and meta-regression was used to analyze sources of heterogeneity.Mepartricin, percutaneous tibial nerve stimulation (PTNS), and triple therapy comprised of doxazosin + ibuprofen + thiocolchicoside (DIT) resulted in clinically and statistically significant reduction in NIH-CPSI total score. The same agents and aerobic exercise resulted in clinically and statistically significant NIH-CPSI pain domain score reduction. Acupuncture, DIT, and PTNS were found to produce statistically and clinically significant reductions in the NIH-CPSI voiding domain. A statistically significant placebo effect was found for all outcomes and time analysis showed that efficacy of all treatments increased over time. Alpha-blockers, antibiotics, and combinations of the two failed to show statistically or clinically significant NIH-CPSI reductions.Results from this meta-analysis reflect our current inability to effectively manage CP/CPPS. Clinicians and researchers must consider placebo effect and treatment efficacy over time and design studies creatively so we can more fully elucidate the etiology and role of therapeutic intervention in CP/CPPS.Effect of allopurinol in chronic nonbacterial prostatitis: a double blind randomized clinical trial.The exact mechanism of chronic nonbacterial prostatitis has not been yet elucidated and the outcome with the current management is dismal. In this trial, we studied the effect of allopurinol in the treatment of this disease.In this randomized double blind controlled trial, a calculated sample size of 56 were grouped into "intervention group" who received allopurinol (100 mg tds for 3 months) with ofloxacin (200 mg tds) for 3 weeks (n = 29) and "control group" who received placebo tablets with ofloxacin (n = 27). Patients' scores based on the National Institute of Health Chronic Prostatitis Symptom Score were recorded before therapy and then every month during the study. A four-glass study was performed before intervention and after 3 months.The 2 groups were similar regarding outcome variables. In the first month of study, a significant but similar improvement in symptom scores was observed in both groups. Microscopic examination of prostate massage and post-massage samples were also similar in both groups. No side effects due to allopurinol were observed in patients.We did not find any advantage for allopurinol in the management of chronic prostatitis versus placebo in patients receiving routine antibacterial treatment.